Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1476.02
Lottery contractor contribution; receipt prohibited; penalty.

(1) No person, including a candidate or candidate committee, shall accept or receive any contribution prohibited by section 49-1476.01. A person who knowingly or intentionally accepts any such contribution shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) Any person, including a candidate or candidate committee, who receives a contribution prohibited by section 49-1476.01 shall, upon being notified of the violation by the commission, transfer a sum equal to the amount of such contribution to a tax-exempt charitable institution.

Laws 1995, LB 28, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 49-1469.03;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 27.